Louisiana, session 2026, SB151.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:609(K) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§609. Drawing or taking of DNA samples
* * *
K. (1)Any person required by law to submit a DNA sample and who has
failed to provide that sample, shall be considered noncompliant.
(2) Upon notification of noncompliance by the appropriate agency, the
office of motor vehicles shall place a flag on the person's driving record. The
office of motor vehicles shall not issue, renew, or reinstate any driver's license
for the person until proof of compliance with the DNA submission requirement
has been received.
(3) No later than January 1, 2027, the state police shall promulgate rules
to flag a driver's license for outstanding Combined DNA Index System (CODIS)
hits and persons that lawfully owe the state a DNA sample in order to complete
their full DNA profile.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.